Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.010

Purpose.

The legislature declares that the drilling, making or constructing of wells within the state is a business and activity of vital interest to the public. In order to protect the public health, welfare, and safety of the people it is necessary that provision be made for the regulation and licensing of well contractors and operators and for the regulation of well design and construction.

[ 1993 c 387 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 1.]